Missouri, session 2026, SB1340.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.417, to read as
follows:
376.417. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "340B drug", the same meaning given to the term in
section 376.414;
(2) "Covered entity", any entity described in
subparagraphs (A) to (K) of subsection (a)(4) of Section
340B of the Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. Section
256b, including any pharmacy with which such entity has
contracted to dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the entity;
(3) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the
term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Pharmacy", an entity licensed under chapter 338;
(5) "Pharmacy benefits manager", the same meaning
given to the term in section 376.388.
2. A health carrier, a pharmacy benefits manager, or
an agent or affiliate of such health carrier or pharmacy
benefits manager shall not discriminate against a covered

SB 1340 2
entity including, but not limited to, by doing any of the
following:
(1) Reimbursing a covered entity for a quantity of a
340B drug in an amount less than it would pay any other
similarly situated pharmacy or entity that is not a covered
entity for such quantity of such drug on the basis that the
covered entity is a covered entity or that the covered
entity dispenses 340B drugs. The director of the department
of commerce and insurance shall specify by rule the
circumstances under which a pharmacy or entity shall be
deemed a "similarly situated pharmacy or entity" for
purposes of this subdivision;
(2) Imposing any terms or conditions on covered
entities that differ from such terms or conditions applied
to other similarly situated entities or pharmacies that are
not covered entities on the basis that the covered entity is
a covered entity or that the covered entity dispenses 340B
drugs including, but not limited to, terms or conditions
with respect to any of the following:
(a) Fees, chargebacks, clawbacks, adjustments, or
other assessments;
(b) Professional dispensing fees;
(c) Restrictions or requirements regarding
participation in standard or preferred pharmacy networks;
(d) Requirements relating to the frequency or scope of
audits or to inventory management systems using generally
accepted accounting principles; and
(e) Any other restrictions, conditions, practices, or
policies that, as specified by the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, interfere with the
ability of a covered entity to maximize the value of
discounts provided under 42 U.S.C. Section 256b;

SB 1340 3
(3) Discriminating in reimbursement to a covered
entity based on the determination or indication a drug is a
340B drug;
(4) Requiring a covered entity to identify, either
directly or through a third party, a 340B drug;
(5) Refusing to cover drugs purchased under the 340B
drug-pricing program; or
(6) Requiring a covered entity to reverse, resubmit,
or clarify a 340B drug-pricing claim after the initial
adjudication unless these actions are:
(a) In the normal course of pharmacy business and not
related to 340B drug pricing; or
(b) Required by federal law.
3. The director of the department of commerce and
insurance shall impose a civil penalty on any health
carrier, pharmacy benefits manager, or agent or affiliate of
such health carrier or pharmacy benefits manager that
violates the requirements of this section. Such penalty
shall not exceed five thousand dollars per violation per day.
4. The director of the department of commerce and
insurance shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking

SB 1340 4
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓